Dictionaries/dictionaries-master/sr/sr-Latn.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1655 Y 28
SFX 1655 eti eti
SFX 1655 eti im
SFX 1655 eti iš
SFX 1655 eti i
SFX 1655 eti imo
SFX 1655 eti ite
SFX 1655 eti e
SFX 1655 eti eo
SFX 1655 eti ela
SFX 1655 eti elo
SFX 1655 eti eli
SFX 1655 eti ele
SFX 1655 eti eću
SFX 1655 eti ećeš
SFX 1655 eti eće
SFX 1655 eti ećemo
SFX 1655 eti ećete
SFX 1655 eti eće
SFX 1655 eti i
SFX 1655 eti imo
SFX 1655 eti ite
SFX 1655 eti eh
SFX 1655 eti e
SFX 1655 eti eše
SFX 1655 eti esmo
SFX 1655 eti este
SFX 1655 eti ehu
SFX 1655 eti evši

SFX 1656 Y 28
SFX 1656 ći ti
SFX 1656 ći gnem
SFX 1656 ći gneš
SFX 1656 ći gne
SFX 1656 ći gnemo
SFX 1656 ći gnete
SFX 1656 ći gnu
SFX 1656 ći gao
SFX 1656 ći gla
SFX 1656 ći glo
SFX 1656 ći gli
SFX 1656 ći gle
SFX 1656 ći gnuću
SFX 1656 ći gnućeš
SFX 1656 ći gnuće
SFX 1656 ći gnućemo
SFX 1656 ći gnućete
SFX 1656 ći gnuće
SFX 1656 ći gni
SFX 1656 ći gnimo
SFX 1656 ći gnite
SFX 1656 ći goh
SFX 1656 ći že
SFX 1656 ći goše
SFX 1656 ći gosmo
SFX 1656 ći goste
SFX 1656 ći žahu
SFX 1656 ći gavši

SFX 1657 Y 34
SFX 1657 biti biti
SFX 1657 biti bijem
SFX 1657 biti biješ
SFX 1657 biti bije
SFX 1657 biti bijemo
SFX 1657 biti bijete
SFX 1657 biti udem
SFX 1657 biti udeš
SFX 1657 biti ude
SFX 1657 biti udemo
SFX 1657 biti udete
SFX 1657 biti udu
SFX 1657 biti biju
SFX 1657 biti bio
SFX 1657 biti bila
SFX 1657 biti bilo
SFX 1657 biti bili
SFX 1657 biti bile
SFX 1657 biti biću
SFX 1657 biti bićeš
SFX 1657 biti biće
SFX 1657 biti bićemo
SFX 1657 biti bićete
SFX 1657 biti biće
SFX 1657 biti bij
SFX 1657 biti bijmo
SFX 1657 biti bijte
SFX 1657 biti bih
SFX 1657 biti bi
SFX 1657 biti biše
SFX 1657 biti bismo
SFX 1657 biti biste
SFX 1657 biti bahu
SFX 1657 biti bivši

SFX 1658 Y 27
SFX 1658 vati vati
SFX 1658 vati ovem
SFX 1658 vati oveš
SFX 1658 vati ove
SFX 1658 vati ovemo
SFX 1658 vati ovete
SFX 1658 vati ovu
SFX 1658 vati vao
SFX 1658 vati vala
SFX 1658 vati valo
SFX 1658 vati vali
SFX 1658 vati vale
SFX 1658 vati vaću
SFX 1658 vati vaćeš
SFX 1658 vati vaće
SFX 1658 vati vaćemo
SFX 1658 vati vaćete
SFX 1658 vati vaće
SFX 1658 vati ovi
SFX 1658 vati ovimo
SFX 1658 vati ovite
SFX 1658 vati vah
SFX 1658 vati vaše
SFX 1658 vati vasmo
SFX 1658 vati vaste
SFX 1658 vati vahu
SFX 1658 vati vajući

SFX 1659 Y 27
SFX 1659 ati ati
SFX 1659 ati im
SFX 1659 ati iš
SFX 1659 ati i
SFX 1659 ati imo
SFX 1659 ati ite
SFX 1659 ati e
SFX 1659 ati ao
SFX 1659 ati ala
SFX 1659 ati alo
SFX 1659 ati ali
SFX 1659 ati ale
SFX 1659 ati aću
SFX 1659 ati aćeš
SFX 1659 ati aće
SFX 1659 ati aćemo
SFX 1659 ati aćete
SFX 1659 ati aće
SFX 1659 ati i
SFX 1659 ati aio
SFX 1659 ati ite
SFX 1659 ati ah
SFX 1659 ati aše
SFX 1659 ati asmo
SFX 1659 ati aste
SFX 1659 ati ahu
SFX 1659 ati eći

SFX 1660 Y 28
SFX 1660 iti iti
SFX 1660 iti im
SFX 1660 iti iš
SFX 1660 iti i
SFX 1660 iti imo
SFX 1660 iti ite
SFX 1660 iti e
SFX 1660 iti io
SFX 1660 iti ila
SFX 1660 iti ilo
SFX 1660 iti ili
SFX 1660 iti ile
SFX 1660 iti iću
SFX 1660 iti ićeš
SFX 1660 iti iće
SFX 1660 iti ićemo
SFX 1660 iti ićete
SFX 1660 iti iće
SFX 1660 iti i
SFX 1660 iti imo
SFX 1660 iti ite
SFX 1660 iti ih
SFX 1660 iti i
SFX 1660 iti iše
SFX 1660 iti ismo
SFX 1660 iti iste
SFX 1660 iti njahu
SFX 1660 iti ivši

SFX 1661 Y 28
SFX 1661 ti ti
SFX 1661 ti nem
SFX 1661 ti neš
SFX 1661 ti ne
SFX 1661 ti nemo
SFX 1661 ti nete
SFX 1661 ti nu
SFX 1661 ti o
SFX 1661 ti la
SFX 1661 ti lo
SFX 1661 ti li
SFX 1661 ti le
SFX 1661 ti nuću
SFX 1661 ti nućeš
SFX 1661 ti nuće
SFX 1661 ti nućemo
SFX 1661 ti nućete
SFX 1661 ti nuće
SFX 1661 ti ni
SFX 1661 ti nimo
SFX 1661 ti nite
SFX 1661 ti nuh
SFX 1661 ti nu
SFX 1661 ti nuše
SFX 1661 ti nusmo
SFX 1661 ti nuste
SFX 1661 ti hu
SFX 1661 ti nuvši

SFX 1662 Y 27
SFX 1662 njeti njeti
SFX 1662 njeti nim
SFX 1662 njeti niš
SFX 1662 njeti ni
SFX 1662 njeti nimo
SFX 1662 njeti nite
SFX 1662 njeti ne
SFX 1662 njeti nio
SFX 1662 njeti njela
SFX 1662 njeti njelo
SFX 1662 njeti njeli
SFX 1662 njeti njele
SFX 1662 njeti njeću
SFX 1662 njeti njećeš
SFX 1662 njeti njeće
SFX 1662 njeti njećemo
SFX 1662 njeti njećete
SFX 1662 njeti njeće
SFX 1662 njeti ni
SFX 1662 njeti nimo
SFX 1662 njeti nite
SFX 1662 njeti njeh
SFX 1662 njeti nješe
SFX 1662 njeti njesmo
SFX 1662 njeti njeste
SFX 1662 njeti njehu
SFX 1662 njeti njeći

SFX 1663 Y 28
SFX 1663 sati sati
SFX 1663 sati šem
SFX 1663 sati šeš
SFX 1663 sati še
SFX 1663 sati šemo
SFX 1663 sati šete
SFX 1663 sati šu
SFX 1663 sati sao
SFX 1663 sati sala
SFX 1663 sati salo
SFX 1663 sati sali
SFX 1663 sati sale
SFX 1663 sati saću
SFX 1663 sati saćeš
SFX 1663 sati saće
SFX 1663 sati saćemo
SFX 1663 sati saćete
SFX 1663 sati saće
SFX 1663 sati ši
SFX 1663 sati šimo
SFX 1663 sati šite
SFX 1663 sati sah
SFX 1663 sati sa
SFX 1663 sati saše
SFX 1663 sati sasmo
SFX 1663 sati saste
SFX 1663 sati šahu
SFX 1663 sati savši

SFX 1664 Y 28
SFX 1664 psti psti
SFX 1664 psti bem
SFX 1664 psti beš
SFX 1664 psti be
SFX 1664 psti bemo
SFX 1664 psti bete
SFX 1664 psti bu
SFX 1664 psti bao
SFX 1664 psti bla
SFX 1664 psti blo
SFX 1664 psti bli
SFX 1664 psti ble
SFX 1664 psti pšću
SFX 1664 psti pšćeš
SFX 1664 psti pšće
SFX 1664 psti pšćemo
SFX 1664 psti pšćete
SFX 1664 psti pšće
SFX 1664 psti bi
SFX 1664 psti bimo
SFX 1664 psti bite
SFX 1664 psti boh
SFX 1664 psti be
SFX 1664 psti boše
SFX 1664 psti bosmo
SFX 1664 psti boste
SFX 1664 psti bahu
SFX 1664 psti bajući

SFX 1665 Y 27
SFX 1665 ati ati
SFX 1665 ati am
SFX 1665 ati aš
SFX 1665 ati a
SFX 1665 ati amo
SFX 1665 ati ate
SFX 1665 ati aje
SFX 1665 ati ao
SFX 1665 ati ala
SFX 1665 ati alo
SFX 1665 ati ali
SFX 1665 ati ale
SFX 1665 ati aću
SFX 1665 ati aćeš
SFX 1665 ati aće
SFX 1665 ati aćemo
SFX 1665 ati aćete
SFX 1665 ati aće
SFX 1665 ati a
SFX 1665 ati amo
SFX 1665 ati ate
SFX 1665 ati ah
SFX 1665 ati aše
SFX 1665 ati asmo
SFX 1665 ati aste
SFX 1665 ati ahu
SFX 1665 ati ajeći

SFX 1666 Y 28
SFX 1666 ebiti ebiti
SFX 1666 ebiti ebim
SFX 1666 ebiti ebiš
SFX 1666 ebiti ebi
SFX 1666 ebiti ebimo
SFX 1666 ebiti ebite
SFX 1666 ebiti ebe
SFX 1666 ebiti ebio
SFX 1666 ebiti ebila
SFX 1666 ebiti ebilo
SFX 1666 ebiti ebili
SFX 1666 ebiti ebile
SFX 1666 ebiti ebiću
SFX 1666 ebiti ebićeš
SFX 1666 ebiti ebiće
SFX 1666 ebiti ebićemo
SFX 1666 ebiti ebićete
SFX 1666 ebiti ebiće
SFX 1666 ebiti ebi
SFX 1666 ebiti ebimo
SFX 1666 ebiti ebite
SFX 1666 ebiti ebih
SFX 1666 ebiti ebi
SFX 1666 ebiti ebiše
SFX 1666 ebiti ebismo
SFX 1666 ebiti ebiste
SFX 1666 ebiti abljahu
SFX 1666 ebiti ebivši

SFX 1667 Y 33
SFX 1667 ati ati
SFX 1667 ati am
SFX 1667 ati aš
SFX 1667 ati a
SFX 1667 ati amo
SFX 1667 ati ate
SFX 1667 ati aju
SFX 1667 ati ao
SFX 1667 ati ala
SFX 1667 ati alo
SFX 1667 ati ali
SFX 1667 ati ale
SFX 1667 ati aću
SFX 1667 ati aćeš
SFX 1667 ati aće
SFX 1667 ati aćemo
SFX 1667 ati aćete
SFX 1667 ati aće
SFX 1667 ati aj
SFX 1667 ati ajmo
SFX 1667 ati ajte
SFX 1667 ati ah
SFX 1667 ati ade
SFX 1667 ati aše
SFX 1667 ati asmo
SFX 1667 ati aste
SFX 1667 ati adoh
SFX 1667 ati ade
SFX 1667 ati adoše
SFX 1667 ati adosmo
SFX 1667 ati adoste
SFX 1667 ati ahu
SFX 1667 ati ajući

SFX 1668 Y 36
SFX 1668 eti eti
SFX 1668 eti em
SFX 1668 eti eš
SFX 1668 eti e
SFX 1668 eti emo
SFX 1668 eti ete
SFX 1668 eti im
SFX 1668 eti iš
SFX 1668 eti i
SFX 1668 eti imo
SFX 1668 eti ite
SFX 1668 eti u
SFX 1668 eti eo
SFX 1668 eti ela
SFX 1668 eti elo
SFX 1668 eti eli
SFX 1668 eti ele
SFX 1668 eti eću
SFX 1668 eti ećeš
SFX 1668 eti eće
SFX 1668 eti ećemo
SFX 1668 eti ećete
SFX 1668 eti eće
SFX 1668 eti i
SFX 1668 eti imo
SFX 1668 eti ite
SFX 1668 eti eh
SFX 1668 eti eše
SFX 1668 eti esmo
SFX 1668 eti este
SFX 1668 eti ih
SFX 1668 eti iše
SFX 1668 eti ismo
SFX 1668 eti iste
SFX 1668 eti ehu
SFX 1668 eti ijući
