Dictionaries/dictionaries-master/sr/sr-Latn.dic
zašumeti/1655
zbeći/1656
zbiti/1657
zvati/1658
zvrjati/1659
zgrbiti/1660
zdeti/1661
zelenjeti/1662
zemljosati/1663
zepsti/1664
zjati/1665
zloupotrebiti/1666
zloupotrijebiti/1666
znati/1667
zreti/1668
iždrebiti/1666
iždrijebiti/1666
ižlebiti/1666
ižlijebiti/1666
izbeći/1656
izdeti/1661
izlapeti/1655
izumeti/1655
istrebiti/1666
istrijebiti/1666
ishlapeti/1655
natrebiti/1666
oždrebiti/1666
oždrijebiti/1666
ožigosati/1663
ožlebiti/1666
opskrbiti/1660
otrebiti/1666
otrijebiti/1666
pogrbiti/1660
poistrebiti/1666
popatosati/1663
posrbiti/1660
pretrebiti/1666
pretrijebiti/1666
priskrbiti/1660
razbeći/1656
razdeti/1661
rastrebiti/1666
rastrijebiti/1666
rumenjeti/1662
užlebiti/1666
užlijebiti/1666
užljebiti/1666
uzdati/1667
upotrebiti/1666
upotrijebiti/1666
uhlebiti/1666
uhljebiti/1666
crvenjeti/1662
šarenjeti/1662
